DIAGNOSTICS

ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI-251

DIARK-01

DTC

C 1242 /42

IG2 Power Source Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC No.

DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

C1242/ 42

With the vehicle running, open circuit in IG2 is detected for

more than 7 sec.

* Battery
«ICregulator
e Power source circuit

WIRING DIAGRAM

Engine Room J/B
1 AM2 9 Skid Control ECU
B-G 1C 1B )
126 Ignition SW
_ _ W-R
J14 LB 1GT Sy AMT B-R Cowl Side J/B LH
I
= B-R 1G2 «\icAmz W-R | 10
A A 5 o - 2E 2A
B-R
Cowl Side J/B LH _
1G1 No. 2 Rel Cowl Side J/B RH
Shalid 37 22 IGN 4
T2 = 3B 3E
ECU-IG1 18
2B}
s~oTa 138 6
B-R yon,
(20)&—+—fo~}—— (5 10
B-wW )
(A37) IG1
B-G W_B 7
1 |JBNo.2 ALT FL Block (A29) GND4
F3g 3 1 |w-B 1
fFi? MAIN (A29)GND3
= oSo—* I 18 2| wg 2
-+ (A37) GND1
Q? Battery | | e
T )< Cowl Side W-B
EE(1) | IF(*1)] J/BLH(*)RH(*2) GND2
1 *1: LHD EB(*2) | 1I(*2)
N = *2: RHD = = =
F17710
LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)



DI-252 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkbattery voltage.

OK:
Voltage: 10 - 14V

NG> Check and repair the charging system.

@

2 | Check voltage of the ECU IG power source.

Incaseofusingthehand -heldtester:

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and pushthe hand -heldtester main switch ON.

(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Checkthe voltage condition output from the ECU displayed onthe hand -heldtester.
OK:

”Normal” is displayed.

Incaseofnotusingthehand -heldtester:
ON PREPARATION:
@ GND2 - N Remove skid control ECU with connectors still connected.
GND1 IG1 GND3 CHECK:
' = o) (@) Turn the ignition switch ON.

flset ’”"HHJ'(;J'HHH”HJ"U\ (b) Measure voltage between terminals G2 and GND of skid
\M/V control ECU connector.

GND4 OK:

) @ 4 Voltage: 10 - 14V

F09165
OK Turn ignition switch OFF, check and replace
skid control ECU.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-253

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

3 | Check continuity between terminal GND of skid control ECU connector and body

ground.
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CHECK:

Measure resistance between terminal GND of skid control ECU
connector and body ground.

OK:

Resistance: 1 Q or less

OK

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

Check for open circuit in harness and connector between skid control ECU and battery (See page

IN-38).
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